Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1320.02
Unlawful picketing of a funeral;
terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 28-1320.01 to 28-1320.03,
the following definitions apply:

(1) Funeral means the ceremonies and memorial services held in connection
with the burial or cremation of the dead but does not include funeral processions
on public streets or highways; and

(2) Picketing of a funeral means protest activities engaged in by a
person or persons located within five hundred feet of a cemetery,
mortuary, church, or other place of worship during a funeral.

Laws 2006, LB 287, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB284, § 1.